Utah statutes.
53A-11-1203.   Student clubs -- Limited open forum -- Authorization.

(1) (a)  A school may establish and maintain a limited open forum for student clubs pursuant to the provisions of this part, State Board of Education rules, and school governing board policies.

(b)  Notwithstanding the provisions under Subsection (1)(a), a school retains the right to create a closed forum at any time by allowing curricular clubs only.

(2) (a)  A school shall review applications for authorization of clubs on a case-by-case basis.

(b)  Before granting an authorization, the school shall find:

(i)  that the proposed club meets this part's respective requirements of a curricular club or a noncurricular club; and

(ii)  that the proposed club's purpose and activities comply with this part.

(c)  Before granting an authorization, a school may request additional information from the faculty sponsor, from students proposing the club, or from its school governing board, if desired.

(3)  A school shall grant authorization and school facilities use to curricular and noncurricular clubs whose applications are found to meet the requirements of this part, rules of the State Board of Education, and policies of the school governing board and shall limit or deny authorization or school facilities use to proposed clubs that do not meet the requirements of this part, rules of the State Board of Education, and policies of the school governing board.

